Utah statutes.
10-8-43.   Establishment and regulation of markets -- Sale of meats,
poultry, etc.
They may establish markets and market houses, and provide for the regulation
and use thereof, and provide for the place and the manner of sale of meats,
poultry, fish, butter, cheese, lard, vegetables and all other provisions, and
regulate the selling of the same.
